Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Motor Vehicle Licenses
186.051.
Year-round registration system — Cabinet may designate separate registration years — Staggered registration system for commercial motor vehicles.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, the cabinet shall by January 1, 1978, establish a year-round system for the registration of vehicles under the provisions of KRS 186.050(1). The system shall be designed so as to distribute the work load as uniformly as practicable within the various offices of the county clerks, as well as the cabinet, on a year-round basis. In implementing a year-round registration system, the cabinet may establish separate and distinct registration years. Each registration year so designated shall begin on the first day of a calendar month and expire on the last day of the last calendar month in a registration period. Registration periods may be designated to include less than twelve (12) consecutive months and registration fees shall be computed at a rate of one-twelfth (1/12) of the appropriate annual registration fee per month in each registration period. The cabinet may establish a registration year of more than twelve (12) months except that registration fees for designated periods of more than twelve (12) months may be paid at the option of the owner. The cabinet may promulgate reasonable administrative regulations to carry out the orderly implementation and administration of the year-round registration system. Any transaction relating to registration or registration renewal which would cause an unexpired Kentucky motor vehicle license plate to be surrendered shall have that unexpired fee prorated or credited against any additional fee required by a subsequent registration.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, the cabinet shall by April 1, 1980, establish a year-round system for the registration of vehicles under the provisions of KRS 186.050(3)(a). The system shall be designed so as to distribute the work load as uniformly as practicable within the various offices of the county clerks, as well as the cabinet, on a year-round basis. In implementing a year-round registration system, the cabinet may establish separate and distinct registration years. Each registration year so designated shall begin on the first day of a calendar month and expire on the last day of the last calendar month in a registration period. Registration periods may be designated to include less than twelve (12) consecutive months and registration fees shall be computed at a rate of one-twelfth (1/12) of the appropriate annual registration fee per month in each registration period. The cabinet may establish a registration year of more than twelve (12) months except that registration fees for designated periods of more than twelve (12) months may be paid at the option of the owner. The cabinet may promulgate reasonable administrative regulations to carry out the orderly implementation and administration of the year-round registration system.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish a staggered registration system for those commercial motor vehicles registered pursuant to KRS 186.050(13).

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 133, § 25; 1978, ch. 239, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 331, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 241, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 153, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The terms registration year and registration period are synonymous; the registration year is, therefore, determined by the birth date of the owner. The legislative intent is that a registration period or year must commence on the birth month of the owner; therefore, when there is a new owner, a new registration period begins, based on the birth month of the new owner.

OAG 83-47

.

The termination of a registration period is marked by the occurrence of either one of two contingencies whichever happens first: the birth month of the owner of the vehicle or the transfer of ownership of the vehicle; under this interpretation, the new owner is not entitled to be credited with the unexpired time of the previous owner’s registration.

OAG 83-47

.

The Transportation Cabinet must assess registration fees on vehicle transfers in accordance with statutory requirements and may not credit the new owner with the unexpired time on the registration plate.

OAG 83-47

.

A registration for greater than 12 months constitutes a single registration; therefore, even though a registration year should exceed 12 calendar months, the clerk is not entitled to more than a $2.00 fee.

OAG 83-76

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Notes, Vehicular Registration in Kentucky: A Remnant of the Horse and Buggy Age, 69 Ky. L.J. 124 (1980-81).

186.052.
License fee for driveaway operations — Tags. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 139, § 22; 1988, ch. 49, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 174, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 139, § 22; 1988, ch. 49, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 174, § 4, effective July 15, 1996) was repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

186.053.
License for dealer-demonstrator trucks or tractors — Fee — Tags.

Every dealer in motor trucks or tractors to be used in combination with semitrailers who engages in the practice of transporting property for demonstration purposes shall pay to the Department of Vehicle Regulation an annual tax based on the gross weight of the motor vehicle so demonstrated an amount equal to one-half (1/2) the registration fee imposed by KRS 186.050(3). The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall issue a metal license plate designated “dealer demonstration.” The use of such tag shall be limited to demonstration purposes, and the tag may be transferred from one vehicle to another. The Department of Vehicle Regulation may adopt regulations governing the use and transfer of such license tags.

Vehicles used for demonstration and displaying the tag issued hereunder shall not be required to display dealer tags which may be required under the provisions of KRS

186.070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 139, § 23.

186.054.
Taxicab license fees — City licenses. [Renumbered KRS 186.281.]

186.055.
Extra registration fees for trucks having gross weight in excess of 18,000 pounds. [Repealed.]

186.056.
Refund of portion of extra weight fees when ownership and use of vehicle are changed; refund or credit when use permanently discontinued.

Whenever the ownership of a vehicle which has been registered at a declared gross weight in excess of 18,000 pounds under KRS

186.050

is changed, a refund of that portion of the tax paid allocable to the remainder of the unexpired period for which the tax was paid may be refunded as provided for destroyed vehicles in KRS 186.120(1) and in accordance with regulations adopted hereunder.

In the event a vehicle is registered in accordance with KRS 186.050(11), the seller may obtain a refund of the portion of the tax which he had theretofore paid allocable to the remaining complete quarters of the unexpired period for which the tax was paid in the same manner as provided for destroyed vehicles in KRS

186.120

, and in accordance with regulations adopted hereunder.

In the event the use of a vehicle which has been registered according to the terms of any proportional registration agreement pursuant to the provisions of KRS 186.050(13), is permanently discontinued by the registrant, a refund of that portion of the tax which the registrant had heretofore paid to the department, allocable to the remaining complete months of the unexpired period for which the tax was paid may be made to the registrant or a credit of that portion of the tax paid allocable to the remainder of the unexpired period for which the tax was paid may be applied toward the registration of any other vehicle during the current registration period by the registrant. The department shall have the authority to promulgate regulations regarding such refunds or credits.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 57, § 3; 1966, ch. 139, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1974, ch. 90, § 1; 1990, ch. 113, § 1, effective April 1, 1991.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The refund provisions of this section would not apply in the case of a stolen vehicle.

OAG 72-769

.

186.057.
Additional fee for trucks used to haul coal. [Repealed.]

186.0571.
Surtax exemption. [Repealed.]

186.058.
Special provision for coal trucks. [Repealed.]

186.059.
Operation of overweight commercial vehicle — Ineligibility for exemption — Department hearing — Appeal.

Operation of a commercial vehicle at a gross weight in excess of the declared gross weight at which such vehicle is registered under subsection (8), (9), or (10) of KRS

186.050

, shall make any owner or operator, otherwise entitled to a reduced fee set out in those subsections ineligible for same for the entire license year.

The department, upon receipt of information substantiated by affidavit, that any owner or operator is operating a motor vehicle in excess of the gross weight at which it is registered under subsection (8), (9), or (10) of KRS

186.050

, may issue notice to the owner or operator advising that he is ineligible for the reduced fee or, that the privilege is revoked for the current license year. Within thirty (30) days of the date of the issuance of the notice, any affected owner or operator may request a hearing to be conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B. Failure to request a hearing within thirty (30) days of the date of the issuance of the notice shall make the ruling absolute, and the owner or operator shall be liable for the payment of the fees applicable under KRS

186.050

(3) for the entire license year.

If a hearing is requested in accordance with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the owner or operator shall not be entitled to the reduced fee during the interim between the application for hearing and the department’s final order, unless he shall file with the department a bond in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) per vehicle to be applied to the payment of any taxes which the department, as a result of the hearing, may determine are due the Commonwealth.

The question for determination at any hearing held at the request of an owner or operator receiving a notice from the department shall be whether or not the owner or operator has operated a commercial vehicle in excess of the declared gross weight at which it is registered under subsection (8), (9), or (10) or KRS

186.050

. The burden of proof shall be upon the department to show such unlawful operation. Any final order of the department shall be subject to appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, and any bond posted with the department shall be held pending the judgment of the highest court to which the matter is appealed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 96, § 3; 1966, ch. 139, § 7; 1996, ch. 318, § 69, effective July 15, 1996.

186.060.
Motor vehicles leased or owned by governmental units or emergency and ambulance vehicles operated by nonprofit corporations organized by units of government — Use of official plates on motor vehicles leased by governmental entity.

Applications for registration of motor vehicles leased or owned by a county, city, urban-county, or board of education, or emergency and ambulance vehicles operated by nonprofit corporations organized by units of government in the state or by the state or federal government shall be accompanied by a statement from the head of the department of the governmental unit that leases or owns the motor vehicle, certifying that the motor vehicle is leased or owned and operated by the governmental unit. The application and statement shall be forwarded by the county clerk to the cabinet, which shall give special authority to the clerk to register it. Upon receiving that authority, the clerk shall issue a registration receipt and the official number plate described in KRS 186.240(6), and report the registration to the head of the department authorizing the registration. For his services in issuing such certificate of registration and number plate and reporting the same, the county clerk shall be entitled to a fee of three dollars ($3) in each instance, to be paid by the department upon whose authorization such license was issued.

After such registration of any vehicle leased or owned by a county, city, urban-county, or board of education, or emergency and ambulance vehicles operated by nonprofit corporations organized by units of government in the state, or by the state or federal government and after issuance of such number plate for such vehicle so leased or owned, no subsequent registration or renewal of same, and no subsequent renewal of a number plate of the vehicle shall be necessary so long as the vehicle is leased or owned by the governmental unit except in the case of loss or destruction of the license plate. In the event of loss or destruction, the number plate shall be replaced in the same manner as if no plate had ever been issued.

When a motor vehicle leased or owned by a county, city, urban-county, or board of education, or emergency and ambulance vehicles operated by nonprofit corporations organized by units of government in the state, or by the state or federal government is transferred or sold to another governmental unit, a new license plate shall be issued for the vehicle in the same manner as provided for in subsection (1) of this section and shall have the same effect as given to such license plates in subsection (2) of this section.

No person shall use on a motor vehicle, not leased or owned by a county, city, urban-county, board of education, or emergency and ambulance vehicles operated by nonprofit corporations organized by units of government in the state, or the state or federal government, any license plate that has been issued for use on a motor vehicle leased or owned by the governmental unit.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

186.020

and

186.050

, a governmental entity which leases a motor vehicle may have that vehicle equipped with an official plate under this section. Upon termination of the lease agreement, if ownership of the motor vehicle does not revert to an entity allowed to use an official plate under this section, the owner of the motor vehicle shall surrender the official plates and apply for registration under the provisions of KRS

186.050

.

History.

2739g-7: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 122; 1948, ch. 126, §§ 1, 2, 3; 1964, ch. 148, § 1; 1974, ch. 72, § 1; 1986, ch. 419, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 296, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 498, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 428, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 36, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2013, ch. 33, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2021 ch. 53, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

186.061.
Motor vehicles owned by nonprofit volunteer fire department, volunteer fire prevention unit, or volunteer fire protection unit.

Applications for registration of motor vehicles owned exclusively by any nonprofit volunteer fire department, volunteer fire prevention unit, or volunteer fire protection unit shall be accompanied by a statement from the chief or assistant chief of the volunteer fire department or unit that owns the motor vehicle, certifying that the motor vehicle is exclusively owned and operated by the volunteer fire department or unit. The application and statement shall be forwarded by the county clerk to the cabinet, which shall give special authority to the clerk to register it. Upon receiving that authority, the clerk shall issue a registration receipt and the official number plate described in KRS 186.240(6), and report the registration to the head of the cabinet authorizing the registration. For his services in issuing such certificate of registration and number plate and reporting the same, the county clerk shall be entitled to a fee of three dollars ($3) in each instance, to be paid by the volunteer fire department or unit.

After registration of any vehicle owned exclusively by any nonprofit volunteer fire department, volunteer fire prevention unit, or volunteer fire protection unit and after issuance of a number plate for the vehicle so owned, no subsequent registration or renewal of same, and no subsequent renewal of a number plate of the vehicle shall be necessary so long as the vehicle is owned exclusively by the volunteer fire department or unit except in the case of loss or destruction of the license plate. In the event of loss or destruction, the number plate shall be replaced in the same manner as if no plate had ever been issued.

When a motor vehicle owned exclusively by any nonprofit volunteer fire department, volunteer fire prevention unit, or volunteer fire protection unit is transferred or sold to another nonprofit volunteer fire department, volunteer fire prevention unit, or volunteer fire protection unit or another governmental unit a new license plate shall be issued for the vehicle in the same manner as provided for in subsection (1) of this section and shall have the same effect as given to such license plates in subsection (2) of this section.

No person shall use on a motor vehicle, not exclusively owned by any nonprofit volunteer fire department, volunteer fire prevention unit, or volunteer fire protection unit, any license plate that has been issued for use on a motor vehicle owned by a volunteer fire department or unit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 366, § 1; 1990, ch. 296, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 498, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 428, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 2021 ch. 53, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS

186.020

and this section, when read together, make it mandatory for a volunteer fire protection district to register all of its motor vehicles, including fire trucks, owned exclusively by such district, and which are to operate on the public roads in Kentucky.

OAG 76-454

.

186.065.
State-owned vehicles — How marked — Exceptions.

Every state-owned motor vehicle, except as provided in subsection (2), shall have an official license plate. Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) on one (1) door on each side of every state-owned vehicle shall be the great seal of the Commonwealth and the words “For Official Use Only.”

The Department of Revenue, the Transportation Cabinet, the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the Public Protection Cabinet, and the Attorney General may authorize registration under KRS

186.020

and be issued regular license plates for vehicles used for investigatory purposes. The Administrative Office of the Courts may authorize registration under KRS

186.020

and be issued regular license plates for vehicles used by justices and judges of the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals.

The Governor and the Lieutenant Governor may each use one (1) state-owned motor vehicle on which it shall not be necessary to have the state seal or the words “For Official Use Only.”

The Justices and Judges of the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals may each use state-owned motor vehicles on which it shall not be necessary to have the state seal or the words “For Official Use Only.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 23, §§ 1, 2, 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(7); 1990, ch. 28, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2005, ch. 133, § 10, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 234, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Subsection (2) of this section providing regular licensing of state vehicles and nonmarking does not apply to the office of auditor of public accounts.

OAG 76-374

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Motor vehicles, purchase for state use; license plates; markings; regulations, KRS

44.045

.

186.067.
Publicly owned vehicles, how marked — Exceptions.

All publicly owned vehicles shall be properly identified by an insignia on one (1) door on each side of every such vehicle.

Such insignia shall not be less than twelve (12) inches in width and not less than twenty-one (21) inches in length, of a design so chosen by the legislative body of the state, county, or city in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The legislative body may designate a separate insignia for each division, department, agency, bureau or any other authority as may come under their jurisdiction within the state, county or city within the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

Publicly owned vehicle, as used in this section, means any vehicle paid for with public funds and used by an elected or appointed official or employee of the state, county or city within the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate the provisions of KRS

44.045

and

186.065

.

The legislative body of any county or city may exempt from the provisions of this section any vehicle used for investigatory purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section applies to vehicles belonging to school districts and the state board of education (now state board for elementary and secondary education) is the appropriate agency to designate the required insignia for vehicles belonging to school districts.

OAG 72-295

.

A city council may enact an ordinance exempting certain vehicles used for investigation from being labeled.

OAG 73-6

.

Although all publicly owned vehicles, whether owned by the state, county, city or school districts must be labeled as publicly owned, such vehicles used by a school district for investigatory purposes can be exempted from the labeling requirement by authorization of the city council or the fiscal court.

OAG 73-122

.

186.068.
Transit tag for transporting motor vehicle out of state — Administrative regulations — Exclusion of motor vehicle dealers and distributors.

Individual sellers or owners of motor vehicles that would ordinarily be registered under KRS 186.050(3) may obtain a transit tag from the Transportation Cabinet in order to transport the motor vehicle out of state. The fee for each transit tag issued shall be five dollars ($5).

A transit tag issued under this section shall be issued only for a motor vehicle which is ineligible for:

Registration under KRS

186.050

; or

Temporary registration under KRS

186A.100

.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish application forms and procedures for the issuance of transit tags. The application for a transit tag under this section shall be accompanied by proof of vehicle ownership and proof of insurance coverage in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

.

A transit tag issued under this section shall be placed on a motor vehicle in the same manner as a regular license plate.

Transit tags issued under this section shall expire fifteen (15) days from the date of issuance, and shall be designed in a manner that clearly identifies the expiration date on the face of the tag in a tamper-resistant manner.

This section shall not apply to motor vehicle dealers or distributors licensed under KRS Chapter 190.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 34, § 1, effective January 1, 2014.

186.070.
Registration of manufacturers and dealers — Dealer’s plates and stickers — Names of drivers authorized to use dealer’s plates to be available to law enforcement agencies — Revocation of licenses — Appeal.

Every manufacturer of, or dealer in, motor vehicles in this state shall register with each county clerk in which his or her principal office or place of business and branch office, sub-agent, or agency is located, and pay an annual registration fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) to each clerk.

Upon receipt of the twenty-five dollar ($25) fee, the clerk shall issue the manufacturer or dealer a certificate of registration and one (1) dealer plate. Every manufacturer or dealer registered under this section shall be furnished additional dealer’s plates upon the payment of fourteen dollars and fifty cents ($14.50) for each additional plate requested. Three dollars ($3) shall be retained by the clerk for each additional plate issued.

A motor vehicle bearing dealer’s plates may be used on the highways only by the following people:

A licensed dealer, bona fide salesman, or employee of the dealer;

A manufacturer or dealer licensed pursuant to the laws of this state transporting a motor vehicle to his or her place of retail business from a manufacturer or wholesale dealer in motor vehicles; and

A bona fide customer of a licensed dealer, or the customer’s employees when a motor vehicle is being demonstrated. This provision shall be limited to one (1) trip or demonstration to the same prospective customer.

License plates issued under this section shall annually expire on December 31.

As used in this section, “bona fide salesman or employee” means a licensed salesman, or an employee, who is actively engaged in and devotes a substantial part of his or her time to the conduct of the dealer business.

A vehicle bearing a dealer plate, except when the vehicle is being transported to a dealer’s place of business from a manufacturer, shall have, in the case of a new motor vehicle, a “monroney” sticker attached to the vehicle, or, in the case of a used motor vehicle, a Federal Trade Commission buyer’s guide sticker attached to the vehicle.

Each manufacturer and dealer when making application for dealer’s plates shall file a verified statement on at least a quarterly basis with the county clerk, giving the name, address, and Social Security number of each dealer, and each bona fide salesman or employee entitled to the use of the plates for demonstration purposes only. When any bona fide registered salesman or employee is no longer employed by the manufacturer or dealer, the manufacturer or dealer shall file an amended verified statement with the clerk stating that fact, and when any additional salesmen or employees are employed, an amended verified statement showing their names and addresses shall be filed with the clerk so that the records in the clerk’s office will at all times show the bona fide salesmen and employees actually in the service of the registered dealer or manufacturer;

The names of each dealer and each bona fide salesman and employee shall be entered by the clerk into the AVIS where it will be readily available to law enforcement agencies. The information shall be entered by the clerk immediately after each quarterly filing of the verified statement by the dealer;

Any person who is hired as a driver by a motor vehicle dealer for the limited, specific purpose of transporting a motor vehicle to or from that dealer’s place of business may, for that purpose only, operate a motor vehicle bearing a dealer plate. For the purpose of that operation, the dealer shall provide to that driver a permit, provided by the Transportation Cabinet. The permit shall be valid for five (5) days from the date of issuance. A fee shall not be charged for the permit.

The license of any dealer or manufacturer may be revoked by the Transportation Cabinet for the violation of any of the provisions of this section. The manufacturer or dealer shall be given an opportunity to be heard in defense of the charge that he or she has violated any of the provisions of this section, and the Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations governing the revocation procedure. A manufacturer or dealer whose license is revoked may appeal the revocation to the Board of Tax Appeals pursuant to KRS

49.220

. The manufacturer or dealer whose license has been suspended shall be prohibited from engaging in the business of selling or buying motor vehicles. The license of any manufacturer or dealer shall be revoked for a period of one (1) year and his or her dealer’s plates canceled if he or she violates any of the provisions of this section during this suspension period or has been suspended by the cabinet more than twice for violations of this section. At the end of the revocation or suspension period, the manufacturer or dealer whose license has been revoked or suspended and dealer’s plates canceled may follow the provisions of this section and again be registered and secure dealer’s plates from the clerk.

The Transportation Cabinet shall be responsible for the issuance and cancellation of the plates provided for in this section, and the motor vehicle commission shall be responsible for the enforcement of this section, except for the normal responsibilities of law enforcement agencies. The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pertaining to the administration of this section.

HISTORY:

2739g-6: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 190, § 3; 1960, ch. 186, Art. IV, § 10; 1962, ch. 62, § 6; 1964, ch. 141, § 31; 1968, ch. 40, pt. 4, § 3; 1970, ch. 173, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(9); 1976, ch. 133, § 6; 1986, ch. 431, § 10, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 428, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 74, § 91, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 81, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 84 and 428. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 428, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

186.072.
Commercial motor vehicle temporary registration placard — Application process — Uses — Record of use — Activation.

For the purposes of this section, “motor truck” and “truck tractor” shall have the same meaning as established in KRS

189.010

.

Any manufacturer, dealer, or distributor engaged in the business of manufacturing, selling, or customizing truck tractors or motor trucks may obtain a commercial motor vehicle temporary registration placard from the Department of Vehicle Regulation. The fee for each placard shall be one hundred dollars ($100) per placard and each applicant shall specify the number of placards to be issued. A company may make additional requests for temporary placards at any time it exhausts the placards supplied by the department.

The commissioner shall prescribe the application form for the commercial vehicle temporary registration placard, require each applicant to submit proof of eligibility to receive the placard, and certify that the applicant has need of the placard in the ordinary course of business, and may request other information as part of the application process.

The commercial vehicle temporary registration placard shall be placed on a truck tractor or motor truck in the same manner as a regular license plate. The temporary placard shall be issued if a permanent registration issued pursuant to KRS

186.050

or temporary registration issued pursuant to KRS

186A.100

cannot be obtained.

The use of a commercial vehicle temporary placard shall be limited to the following activities:

A demonstration of the truck tractor or motor truck to a prospective purchaser;

The transportation of the truck tractor or motor truck to a facility engaged in the customizing of a motor vehicle for eventual use on the highway;

The transportation of the truck tractor or motor truck to a trade show or other activity designed to promote the selling of the product; or

The transportation of the truck tractor or motor truck by a purchaser to a location outside Kentucky, provided that the truck tractor or motor truck is not eligible to be registered in Kentucky.

Each manufacturer, dealer, or distributor receiving the temporary placards shall maintain a record of use for each temporary placard to include the following:

The make and model of each motor vehicle and the vehicle identification number or other identification number of each vehicle on which a placard is used;

The date the placard was issued and the registration number of the placard;

The address of the final destination and reason for movement of the truck tractor or motor truck receiving the temporary placard; and

A record of insurance coverage or a binder for insurance coverage issued to the recipient of the temporary placard.

A commercial vehicle temporary placard shall not be activated until it is placed upon the truck tractor or motor truck and used in a manner as authorized by subsection (5) of this section. The commercial vehicle temporary placard shall expire thirty (30) days after it is activated and placed in use on a truck tractor or motor truck and shall be designed in a manner that an expiration date shall be noted clearly on the face of the placard.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 176, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2008). 2000 While the lead-in language for this statute in 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 176, sec. 1 provided that “A NEW SECTION KRS 186 (sic) IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:” it is clear that a new statute was actually being created and the Reviser of Statutes has codified it as such to effectuate that intent.

186.073.
Commercial trailer temporary registration placard — Application process — Uses — Record of use — Activation.

For the purposes of this section, “semitrailer” and “trailer” shall have the same meaning as established in KRS

186.650

.

Any manufacturer, dealer, or distributor engaged in the business of manufacturing, selling, or customizing commercial semitrailers or commercial trailers may obtain a commercial trailer temporary registration placard from the Department of Vehicle Regulation. The fee for each placard shall be five dollars ($5) per placard and each applicant shall specify the number of placards to be issued. A company may make additional requests for temporary placards at any time it exhausts the placards supplied by the department.

The commissioner shall prescribe the application form for the commercial trailer temporary registration placard, require each applicant to submit proof of eligibility to receive the placard, and certify that the applicant has need of the placard in the ordinary course of business, and may request other information as part of the application process.

The commercial trailer temporary registration placard shall be placed on a semitrailer or trailer in the same manner as a regular trailer license plate. The temporary placard shall be issued if a permanent registration issued pursuant to KRS

186.655

cannot be obtained.

The use of a commercial trailer temporary registration placard shall be limited to the following activities:

A demonstration of the semitrailer or trailer to a prospective purchaser;

The transportation of the semitrailer or trailer to a facility engaged in the customizing of a motor vehicle for eventual use on the highway;

The transportation of the semitrailer or trailer to a trade show or other activity designed to promote the selling of the product;

The transportation of the semitrailer or trailer by a purchaser to a location outside Kentucky, provided that the semitrailer or trailer is not eligible to be registered in Kentucky; or

Transportation of a trailer or semitrailer from the manufacturer to a place of business in Kentucky in order to obtain a permanent registration issued pursuant to KRS

186.655

.

Each manufacturer, dealer, or distributor receiving the temporary placards shall maintain a record of use for each temporary placard to include the following:

The make and model of each semitrailer or trailer and the vehicle identification number or other identification number of each vehicle on which a placard is used;

The date the placard was issued and the registration number of the placard; and

The address of the final destination and reason for movement of the semitrailer or trailer receiving the temporary placard.

A commercial trailer temporary registration placard shall not be activated until it is placed upon the semitrailer or trailer and used in a manner as authorized by subsection (5) of this section. The commercial trailer temporary registration placard shall expire thirty (30) days after it is activated and placed in use on a semitrailer or trailer and shall be designed in a manner that an expiration date shall be noted clearly on the face of the placard.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 176, § 2, effective July 15, 2008.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2008). 2000 While the lead-in language for this statute in 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 176, sec. 1 provided that “A NEW SECTION KRS 186 (sic) IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:” it is clear that a new statute was actually being created and the Reviser of Statutes has codified it as such to effectuate that intent.

186.074.
Temporary permits. [Repealed.]

186.076.
Revocation of license for failure to transfer registration. [Repealed.]

186.080.
“In-transit” license plates. [Repealed.]

186.090.
Driveaway licenses — Application — Fees. [Repealed.]

186.100.
Towing vehicles — Financial liability — Equipment — Speed. [Repealed.]

186.110.
Interchangeable bodies — Fees.

If a person owns a motor vehicle which has interchangeable bodies for same so that at one time the motor vehicle may be classed as a passenger automobile and at another time as a truck, has registered same as a passenger automobile, he shall, before using it as a truck, pay the registration fee required for trucks in KRS

186.050

. In such case the owner shall be allowed credit for the unearned portion of the passenger registration fee on the truck registration fee.

A passenger automobile shall be construed to have been converted into a truck when the change is such as to enable same to be used as a commercial vehicle.

History.

2739g-3: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 78, §§ 3, 8.

186.115.
Registration of vehicle assembled from parts of wrecked or salvaged motor vehicles.

When the owner of a motor vehicle which has been assembled from parts from wrecked or salvaged motor vehicles presents such a vehicle for registration, he or she shall submit an affidavit and any invoices showing the purchase of such parts to either the county clerk or the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet’s central office in Frankfort. The county clerk shall forward all applications received to the Transportation Cabinet. The cabinet will either authorize or prohibit the registration of the vehicle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 133, § 18; 1978, ch. 384, § 332, effective June 17, 1978; 2013, ch. 35, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.